North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12C. Joint Select Committee on Low-Level Radioactive Waste. [Repealed]

§§ 120-70.31 through 120-70.37.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011 and Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.2(a) effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-70.31; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 3.1; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.32; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 3.1; 1991, c. 739, s. 3; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.33; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 3.1; 1991, c. 342, s. 5; c. 739, s. 4; 1993, c. 501, s. 11; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2001-474, s. 12; 2002-70, s. 4; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.34; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 3.1; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.35; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 3.1; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.36; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 3.1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(e); 2007-495, s. 11; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.37; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 3.1; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.31(a), effective July 1, 2011, and 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§§ 120-70.38 through 120-70.40.

Reserved for future codification purposes.